Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB861.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1723-A.1(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1723-A.1. Distributions from Pennsylvania Race Horse Development Fund.* * *(b) Annual transfers to State Racing Fund.--The General Assembly shall authorize the transfer of funds from the fund to the State Racing Fund to provide for each cost associated with the collection and research of and testing for medication, which shall include the cost of necessary personnel, equipment, supplies and facilities, except holding barns or stables, to be located at horse race facilities, grounds or enclosures or at other locations designated by the commission. All such costs shall be reviewed and approved by the commission. The transfer shall be made in 52 equal weekly installments during the fiscal year before any other distribution from the fund. This subsection shall expire on June 30, [2025] 2028.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days IMMEDIATELY.20250HB0861PN0986 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425